Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4353.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Involuntary statement" means information provided by a law enforcement officer, if compelled under threat of dismissal from employment or any other employment sanction, by the law enforcement agency that employs the law enforcement officer. (b) "Law enforcement agency" means the department of state police, the department of natural resources, or a law enforcement agency of a county, township, city, village, airport authority, qualified authority, community college, or university, that is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and enforcement of the criminal laws of this state. (c) "Law enforcement officer" means all of the following: (i) A person who is trained and licensed or certified under the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.601 to 28.615. (ii) A local corrections officer as defined in section 2 of the local corrections officers training act, 2003 PA 125, MCL 791.532. (iii) An emergency dispatch worker employed by a law enforcement agency. (d) "Qualified authority" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1955 PA 233, MCL 124.281. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02305'25) or House Bill No. 4352 (request no. H02305'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.